Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.27
State Capitol; state buildings; electric current; agreement.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska is authorized to furnish and to enter into agreements with the Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Correctional Services to furnish a supply of electric current to such departments at the line now maintained or hereafter constructed between the electric power plant at the Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility and the State Capitol, which power shall be furnished by the heating plant located upon the city campus of the University of Nebraska at Lincoln, except that such electrical service to the Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Correctional Services for distribution to other state buildings and institutions shall be furnished only if the same may be generated and furnished without impairment or reduction of the power necessary to proper and efficient operation of the University of Nebraska and the State Capitol, including the executive mansion.

Laws 1949, c. 216, § 2, p. 614;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 10;

R.R.S.1943, § 72-710.01;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 18;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 863.